Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 206 Confederate Pensions

206.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

206.020.
Confederate pensions — Persons entitled to. [Repealed.]

206.030.
Persons ineligible for pension. [Repealed.]

206.040.
Application for pension — Procedure. [Repealed.]

206.050.
Cabinet to furnish application blanks. [Repealed.]

206.060.
Military record of applicant to be examined. [Repealed.]

206.070.
Cabinet not bound by findings of county judge/executive. [Repealed.]

206.080.
Officers not to charge fee for collecting pensions — Attorney’s fee. [Repealed.]

206.090.
Funeral expenses — Distribution of pension upon death of pensioner. [Repealed.]

206.100.
Payment of pension. [Repealed.]

206.110.
Claim for pension not to arise until granted. [Repealed.]

206.120.
Pensioner to furnish annual certificate. [Repealed.]

206.130.
Cabinet may make investigation. [Repealed.]

206.140.
Return of pensioner to state — Restoration of pension. [Repealed.]

206.150.
Cabinet to make annual reports. [Repealed.]

206.160.
Pension may be stopped — Hearing. [Repealed.]

206.170.
Pensions exempt from execution. [Repealed.]

206.180.
Kentucky confederate home. [Repealed.]

206.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]